Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4202.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 30. (1) "Taxable income" means, for a person other than a
corporation, estate, or trust, adjusted gross income as defined in
the internal revenue code subject to the following adjustments
under this section:
(a) Add gross interest income and dividends derived from
obligations or securities of states other than Michigan, in the
same amount that has been excluded from adjusted gross income less
related expenses not deducted in computing adjusted gross income
because of section 265(a)(1) of the internal revenue code.
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


(b) Add taxes on or measured by income to the extent the taxes
have been deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income including
any direct or indirect allocated share of taxes paid by a flow-
through entity under part 4.
(c) Add losses on the sale or exchange of obligations of the
United States government, the income of which this state is
prohibited from subjecting to a net income tax, to the extent that
the loss has been deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income.
(d) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
income derived from obligations, or the sale or exchange of
obligations, of the United States government that this state is
prohibited by law from subjecting to a net income tax, reduced by
any interest on indebtedness incurred in carrying the obligations
and by any expenses incurred in the production of that income to
the extent that the expenses, including amortizable bond premiums,
were deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income.
(e) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
the following:
(i) Compensation, including retirement or pension benefits,
received for services in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(ii) Retirement or pension benefits under the railroad
retirement act of 1974, 45 USC 231 to 231v.
(iii) Retirement or pension benefits received for services in
the Michigan National Guard.
(f) Deduct the following to the extent included in adjusted
gross income subject to the limitations and restrictions set forth
in subsection (9), (10), or (11), as applicable:
(i) Retirement or pension benefits received from a federal
public retirement system or from a public retirement system of or
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


created by this state or a political subdivision of this state.
(ii) Retirement or pension benefits received from a public
retirement system of or created by another state or any of its
political subdivisions if the income tax laws of the other state
permit a similar deduction or exemption or a reciprocal deduction
or exemption of a retirement or pension benefit received from a
public retirement system of or created by this state or any of the
political subdivisions of this state.
(iii) Social Security benefits as defined in section 86 of the
internal revenue code.
(iv) Beginning on and after January 1, 2007, retirement or
pension benefits not deductible under subparagraph (i) or
subdivision (e) from any other retirement or pension system or
benefits from a retirement annuity policy in which payments are
made for life to a senior citizen, to a maximum of $42,240.00 for a
single return and $84,480.00 for a joint return. The maximum
amounts allowed under this subparagraph shall be reduced by the
amount of the deduction for retirement or pension benefits claimed
under subparagraph (i) or subdivision (e) and by the amount of a
deduction claimed under subdivision (p). For the 2008 tax year and
each tax year after 2008, the maximum amounts allowed under this
subparagraph shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the
United States Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding
calendar year. The department shall annualize the amounts provided
in this subparagraph as necessary.
(v) The amount determined to be the section 22 amount eligible
for the elderly and the permanently and totally disabled credit
provided in section 22 of the internal revenue code.
(g) Adjustments resulting from the application of section 271.
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


(h) Adjustments with respect to estate and trust income as
provided in section 36.
(i) Adjustments resulting from the allocation and
apportionment provisions of chapter 3.
(j) Deduct the following payments made by the taxpayer in the
tax year:
(i) The amount of a charitable contribution made to the advance
tuition payment fund created under section 9 of the Michigan
education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1429.
(ii) The amount of payment made under an advance tuition
payment contract as provided in the Michigan education trust act,
1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442.
(iii) The amount of payment made under a contract with a private
sector investment manager that meets all of the following criteria:
(A) The contract is certified and approved by the board of
directors of the Michigan education trust to provide equivalent
benefits and rights to purchasers and beneficiaries as an advance
tuition payment contract as described in subparagraph (ii).
(B) The contract applies only for a state institution of
higher education as defined in the Michigan education trust act,
1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, or a community or junior
college in Michigan.
(C) The contract provides for enrollment by the contract's
qualified beneficiary in not less than 4 years after the date on
which the contract is entered into.
(D) The contract is entered into after either of the
following:
(I) The purchaser has had the purchaser's offer to enter into
an advance tuition payment contract rejected by the board of
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


directors of the Michigan education trust, if the board determines
that the trust cannot accept an unlimited number of enrollees upon
an actuarially sound basis.
(II) The board of directors of the Michigan education trust
determines that the trust can accept an unlimited number of
enrollees upon an actuarially sound basis.
(k) If an advance tuition payment contract under the Michigan
education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, or
another contract for which the payment was deductible under
subdivision (j) is terminated and the qualified beneficiary under
that contract does not attend a university, college, junior or
community college, or other institution of higher education, add
the amount of a refund received by the taxpayer as a result of that
termination or the amount of the deduction taken under subdivision
(j) for payment made under that contract, whichever is less.
(l) Deduct from the taxable income of a purchaser the amount
included as income to the purchaser under the internal revenue code
after the advance tuition payment contract entered into under the
Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to
390.1442, is terminated because the qualified beneficiary attends
an institution of postsecondary education other than either a state
institution of higher education or an institution of postsecondary
education located outside this state with which a state institution
of higher education has reciprocity.
(m) Add, to the extent deducted in determining adjusted gross
income, the net operating loss deduction under section 172 of the
internal revenue code.
(n) Deduct a net operating loss deduction for the taxable year
as determined under section 172 of the internal revenue code
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


subject to the modifications under section 172(b)(2) of the
internal revenue code and subject to the allocation and
apportionment provisions of chapter 3 for the taxable year in which
the loss was incurred.
(o) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
benefits from a discriminatory self-insurance medical expense
reimbursement plan.
(p) Beginning on and after January 1, 2007, subject to any
limitation provided in this subdivision, a taxpayer who is a senior
citizen may deduct to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
interest, dividends, and capital gains received in the tax year not
to exceed $9,420.00 for a single return and $18,840.00 for a joint
return. The maximum amounts allowed under this subdivision shall be
reduced by the amount of a deduction claimed for retirement or
pension benefits under subdivision (e) or a deduction claimed under
subdivision (f)(i), (ii), (iv), or (v). For the 2008 tax year and each
tax year after 2008, the maximum amounts allowed under this
subdivision shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the
United States Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding
calendar year. The department shall annualize the amounts provided
in this subdivision as necessary. The deduction under this
subdivision is not available to a senior citizen born after 1945.
(q) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
all of the following:
(i) The amount of a refund received in the tax year based on
taxes paid under this part and any direct or indirect allocated
share of a refund received by a flow-through entity under part 4.
(ii) The amount of a refund received in the tax year based on
taxes paid under the city income tax act, 1964 PA 284, MCL 141.501
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


to 141.787.
(iii) The amount of a credit received in the tax year based on a
claim filed under sections 520 and 522 to the extent that the taxes
used to calculate the credit were not used to reduce adjusted gross
income for a prior year.
(r) Add the amount paid by the state on behalf of the taxpayer
in the tax year to repay the outstanding principal on a loan taken
on which the taxpayer defaulted that was to fund an advance tuition
payment contract entered into under the Michigan education trust
act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, if the cost of the
advance tuition payment contract was deducted under subdivision (j)
and was financed with a Michigan education trust secured loan.
(s) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
any amount, and any interest earned on that amount, received in the
tax year by a taxpayer who is a Holocaust victim as a result of a
settlement of claims against any entity or individual for any
recovered asset pursuant to the German act regulating unresolved
property claims, also known as Gesetz zur Regelung offener
Vermogensfragen, as a result of the settlement of the action
entitled In re: Holocaust victim assets litigation, CV-96-4849, CV-
96-5161, and CV-97-0461 (E.D. NY), or as a result of any similar
action if the income and interest are not commingled in any way
with and are kept separate from all other funds and assets of the
taxpayer. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Holocaust victim" means a person, or the heir or
beneficiary of that person, who was persecuted by Nazi Germany or
any Axis regime during any period from 1933 to 1945.
(ii) "Recovered asset" means any asset of any type and any
interest earned on that asset, including, but not limited to, bank
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


deposits, insurance proceeds, or artwork owned by a Holocaust
victim during the period from 1920 to 1945, withheld from that
Holocaust victim from and after 1945, and not recovered, returned,
or otherwise compensated to the Holocaust victim until after 1993.
(t) Deduct all of the following:
(i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross
income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less
qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from education savings
accounts, calculated on a per education savings account basis,
pursuant to the Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA
161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486, not to exceed a total deduction of
$5,000.00 for a single return or $10,000.00 for a joint return per
tax year. The amount calculated under this subparagraph for each
education savings account shall not be less than zero.
(ii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, interest
earned in the tax year on the contributions to the taxpayer's
education savings accounts if the contributions were deductible
under subparagraph (i).
(iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income,
distributions that are qualified withdrawals from an education
savings account to the designated beneficiary of that education
savings account.
(u) Add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income,
the amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from
education savings accounts, not to exceed the total amount deducted
under subdivision (t) in the tax year and all previous tax years,
if the withdrawal was not a qualified withdrawal as provided in the
Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471
to 390.1486. This subdivision does not apply to withdrawals that
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


are less than the sum of all contributions made to an education
savings account in all previous tax years for which no deduction
was claimed under subdivision (t), less any contributions for which
no deduction was claimed under subdivision (t) that were withdrawn
in all previous tax years.
(v) A taxpayer who is a resident tribal member may deduct, to
the extent included in adjusted gross income, all nonbusiness
income earned or received in the tax year and during the period in
which an agreement entered into between the taxpayer's tribe and
this state pursuant to section 30c of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30c, is
in full force and effect. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Business income" means business income as defined in
section 4 and apportioned under chapter 3.
(ii) "Nonbusiness income" means nonbusiness income as defined
in section 14 and, to the extent not included in business income,
all of the following:
(A) All income derived from wages whether the wages are earned
within the agreement area or outside of the agreement area.
(B) All interest and passive dividends.
(C) All rents and royalties derived from real property located
within the agreement area.
(D) All rents and royalties derived from tangible personal
property, to the extent the personal property is utilized within
the agreement area.
(E) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of real property
located within the agreement area.
(F) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of tangible
personal property located within the agreement area at the time of
sale.
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


(G) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of intangible
personal property.
(H) All pension income and benefits, including, but not
limited to, distributions from a 401(k) plan, individual retirement
accounts under section 408 of the internal revenue code, or a
defined contribution plan, or payments from a defined benefit plan.
(I) All per capita payments by the tribe to resident tribal
members, without regard to the source of payment.
(J) All gaming winnings.
(iii) "Resident tribal member" means an individual who meets all
of the following criteria:
(A) Is an enrolled member of a federally recognized tribe.
(B) The individual's tribe has an agreement with this state
pursuant to section 30c of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30c, that is in
full force and effect.
(C) The individual's principal place of residence is located
within the agreement area as designated in the agreement under sub-
subparagraph (B).
(w) Eliminate all of the following:
(i) Income from producing oil and gas to the extent included in
adjusted gross income.
(ii) Expenses of producing oil and gas to the extent deducted
in arriving at adjusted gross income.
(x) Deduct all of the following:
(i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross
income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less
qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from an ABLE savings
account, pursuant to the Michigan achieving a better life
experience (ABLE) program act, 2015 PA 160, MCL 206.981 to 206.997,
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


not to exceed a total deduction of $5,000.00 for a single return or
$10,000.00 for a joint return per tax year. The amount calculated
under this subparagraph for an ABLE savings account shall not be
less than zero.
(ii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, interest
earned in the tax year on the contributions to the taxpayer's ABLE
savings account if the contributions were deductible under
subparagraph (i).
(iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income,
distributions that are qualified withdrawals from an ABLE savings
account to the designated beneficiary of that ABLE savings account.
(y) Add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income,
the amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from
an ABLE savings account, not to exceed the total amount deducted
under subdivision (x) in the tax year and all previous tax years,
if the withdrawal was not a qualified withdrawal as provided in the
Michigan achieving a better life experience (ABLE) program act,
2015 PA 160, MCL 206.981 to 206.997. This subdivision does not
apply to withdrawals that are less than the sum of all
contributions made to an ABLE savings account in all previous tax
years for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (x),
less any contributions for which no deduction was claimed under
subdivision (x) that were withdrawn in all previous tax years.
(z) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income,
compensation received in the tax year pursuant to the wrongful
imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to
691.1757.
(aa) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2025, a
taxpayer who is a disabled veteran may deduct, to the extent
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


included in adjusted gross income, income reported on a federal
income tax form 1099-C that is attributable to the cancellation or
discharge of a student loan by the United States Department of
Education pursuant to the total and permanent disability discharge
program, 34 CFR 685.213. As used in this subdivision, "disabled
veteran" means an individual who meets either of the following
criteria:
(i) Has been determined by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs to be permanently and totally disabled as a result
of military service and entitled to veterans' benefits at the 100%
rate.
(ii) Has been rated by the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs as individually unemployable.
(bb) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2021,
and subject to the limitation under this subdivision, deduct, to
the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income,
wagering losses deducted under section 165(d) of the internal
revenue code on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the
same tax year. For a nonresident, only wagering losses that are
attributable to wagering transactions placed at or through a casino
or licensed race meeting located in this state may be deducted and
must not exceed the gains on wagering transactions allocated to
this state under section 110(2)(d). As used in this subdivision,
"casino" and "licensed race meeting" mean those terms as defined in
section 110.
(cc) Except as otherwise provided under subparagraph (i), for
tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2022, deduct all of
the following:
(i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less
qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from a first-time home
buyer savings account, pursuant to the Michigan first-time home
buyer savings program act, 2022 PA 6, MCL 565.1001 to 565.1013, not
to exceed a total deduction of $5,000.00 for a single return or
$10,000.00 for a joint return per tax year. The amount calculated
under this subparagraph for a first-time home buyer savings account
shall not be less than zero. The deduction under this subparagraph
does not apply for tax years that begin after December 31, 2026.
(ii) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross
income, interest earned in the tax year on the contributions to the
taxpayer's first-time home buyer savings account.
(iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income,
distributions that are qualified withdrawals from a first-time home
buyer savings account to the qualified beneficiary of that savings
account.
(dd) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2022,
add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income, the
amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from a
first-time home buyer savings account, not to exceed the total
amount deducted under subdivision (cc) in the tax year and all
previous tax years, if the withdrawal was not a qualified
withdrawal as provided in the Michigan first-time home buyer
savings program act, 2022 PA 6, MCL 565.1001 to 565.1013. This
subdivision does not apply to withdrawals that are less than the
sum of all contributions made to a first-time home buyer savings
account in all previous tax years for which no deduction was
claimed under subdivision (cc), less any contributions for which no
deduction was claimed under subdivision (cc) that were withdrawn in
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


all previous tax years.
(ee) Subject to the limitations under this subdivision, for
tax years beginning after December 31, 2025 and before January 1,
2029, deduct, to the extent not deducted in determining adjusted
gross income, an amount equal to the sum of the following
deductions allowed to be claimed on the taxpayer's federal income
tax return for the same tax year:
(i) Qualified tips under section 224 of the internal revenue
code. For a nonresident, only qualified tips that are attributable
to services performed in this state may be deducted.
(ii) Qualified overtime compensation under section 225 of the
internal revenue code. For a nonresident, only qualified overtime
compensation that is attributable to services performed in this
state may be deducted.
(ff) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2024, adjusted
gross income must be calculated as if both of the following
conditions applied, subject to any necessary adjustments under
subparagraph (iii):
(i) Sections 168(n) and 174A of the internal revenue code were
not in effect.
(ii) Sections 163(j), 168(k), 174, and 179 of the internal
revenue code applied as those provisions were in effect on December
31, 2024.
(iii) The state treasurer shall, if necessary, modify the
application of any references in the internal revenue code to the
sections identified in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) in a reasonable
manner to carry out the purpose of this subdivision, including, but
not limited to, modifying the application of section references
that were amended under Public Law 119-21.
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


(gg) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2021, adjusted
gross income must be calculated as if the transition rules under
section 70302 of Public Law 119-21, including, but not limited to,
any provisions related to the application of section 174A of the
internal revenue code, do not apply.
(hh) Add, to the extent deducted in determining adjusted gross
income, wages paid for organ donation leave for which a credit
under section 279 or 679 is claimed.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), and
section 30a, a personal exemption of $3,700.00 multiplied by the
number of personal and dependency exemptions shall be subtracted in
the calculation that determines taxable income. The number of
personal and dependency exemptions allowed shall be determined as
follows:
(a) Each taxpayer may claim 1 personal exemption. However, if
a joint return is not made by the taxpayer and the taxpayer's
spouse, the taxpayer may claim a personal exemption for the spouse
if the spouse, for the calendar year in which the taxable year of
the taxpayer begins, does not have any gross income and is not the
dependent of another taxpayer.
(b) A taxpayer may claim a dependency exemption for each
individual who is a dependent of the taxpayer for the tax year.
(c) A taxpayer may claim an additional exemption under this
subsection in the tax year for which the taxpayer has a certificate
of stillbirth from the department of health and human services as
provided under section 2834 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368,
MCL 333.2834.
(d) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2028, a
taxpayer who is at least 12 weeks pregnant as of the last day of
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


the tax year and has been under the care and observation of a
health care professional since at least the twelfth week of
pregnancy may claim an additional exemption under this subsection
for that same tax year. In order to claim the exemption under this
subdivision, the taxpayer shall request a medical statement from
the taxpayer's health care professional verifying that the taxpayer
is at least 12 weeks pregnant as of the last day of the tax year
and shall attach the medical statement to the annual return filed
under this part for the same tax year for which the exemption is
claimed. The medical statement required under this subdivision must
be signed and dated by the health care professional. As used in
this subdivision, "health care professional" means any of the
following:
(i) An individual licensed to engage in the practice of
medicine or the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery under
part 170 or 175 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.17001 to 333.17097 and 333.17501 to 333.17556.
(ii) An individual licensed to engage in the practice of
midwifery under part 171 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368,
MCL 333.17101 to 333.17123.
(iii) An individual who is licensed as a registered professional
nurse under part 172 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.17201 to 333.17242, and who has been granted a specialty
certification as a nurse practitioner or a specialty certification
in the health profession specialty field of nurse midwifery by the
Michigan board of nursing under section 17210 of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17210.
(iv) An individual who is a doula who provides continuous
physical, emotional, and informational support to a mother before,
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


during, and shortly after childbirth to help the mother achieve a
healthy and satisfying childbirth experience.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), a single
additional exemption determined as follows shall be subtracted in
the calculation that determines taxable income in each of the
following circumstances:
(a) $1,800.00 for each taxpayer and every dependent of the
taxpayer who is a deaf person as defined in section 2 of the deaf
persons' interpreters act, 1982 PA 204, MCL 393.502; a paraplegic,
a quadriplegic, or a hemiplegic; a person who is blind as defined
in section 504; or a person who is totally and permanently disabled
as defined in section 522. When a dependent of a taxpayer files an
annual return under this part, the taxpayer or dependent of the
taxpayer, but not both, may claim the additional exemption allowed
under this subdivision.
(b) For tax years beginning after 2007, $250.00 for each
taxpayer and every dependent of the taxpayer who is a qualified
disabled veteran. When a dependent of a taxpayer files an annual
return under this part, the taxpayer or dependent of the taxpayer,
but not both, may claim the additional exemption allowed under this
subdivision. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Qualified disabled veteran" means a veteran with a
service-connected disability.
(ii) "Service-connected disability" means a disability incurred
or aggravated in the line of duty in the active military, naval, or
air service as described in 38 USC 101(16).
(iii) "Veteran" means an individual who served in the active
military, naval, marine, coast guard, or air service and who was
discharged or released from the individual's service with an
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


honorable or general discharge.
(4) An individual with respect to whom a deduction under
subsection (2) is allowable to another taxpayer during the tax year
is not entitled to an exemption for purposes of subsection (2), but
may subtract $1,500.00 in the calculation that determines taxable
income for a tax year.
(5) A nonresident or a part-year resident is allowed that
proportion of an exemption or deduction allowed under subsection
(2), (3), or (4) that the taxpayer's portion of adjusted gross
income from Michigan sources bears to the taxpayer's total adjusted
gross income.
(6) In calculating taxable income, a taxpayer shall not
subtract from adjusted gross income the amount of prizes won by the
taxpayer under the McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act,
1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47.
(7) For each tax year beginning on and after January 1, 2013,
the personal exemption allowed under subsection (2) shall be
adjusted by multiplying the exemption for the tax year beginning in
2012 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the United States
Consumer Price Index for the state fiscal year ending in the tax
year prior to the tax year for which the adjustment is being made
and the denominator of which is the United States Consumer Price
Index for the 2010-2011 state fiscal year. For the 2022 tax year
and each tax year after 2022, the adjusted amount determined under
this subsection shall be increased by an additional $600.00. The
resultant product shall be rounded to the nearest $100.00
increment. For each tax year, the exemptions allowed under
subsection (3) shall be adjusted by multiplying the exemption
amount under subsection (3) for the tax year by a fraction, the
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


numerator of which is the United States Consumer Price Index for
the state fiscal year ending the tax year prior to the tax year for
which the adjustment is being made and the denominator of which is
the United States Consumer Price Index for the 1998-1999 state
fiscal year. The resultant product shall be rounded to the nearest
$100.00 increment.
(8) As used in this section, "retirement or pension benefits"
means distributions from all of the following:
(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), qualified pension
trusts and annuity plans that qualify under section 401(a) of the
internal revenue code, including all of the following:
(i) Plans for self-employed persons, commonly known as Keogh or
HR10 plans.
(ii) Individual retirement accounts that qualify under section
408 of the internal revenue code if the distributions are not made
until the participant has reached 59-1/2 years of age, except in
the case of death, disability, or distributions described by
section 72(t)(2)(A)(iv) of the internal revenue code.
(iii) Employee annuities or tax-sheltered annuities purchased
under section 403(b) of the internal revenue code by organizations
exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, or by
public school systems.
(iv) Distributions from a 401(k) plan attributable to employee
contributions mandated by the plan or attributable to employer
contributions.
(b) The following retirement and pension plans not qualified
under the internal revenue code:
(i) Plans of the United States, state governments other than
this state, and political subdivisions, agencies, or
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


instrumentalities of this state.
(ii) Plans maintained by a church or a convention or
association of churches.
(iii) All other unqualified pension plans that prescribe
eligibility for retirement and predetermine contributions and
benefits if the distributions are made from a pension trust.
(c) Retirement or pension benefits received by a surviving
spouse if those benefits qualified for a deduction prior to the
decedent's death. Benefits received by a surviving child are not
deductible.
(d) Retirement and pension benefits do not include:
(i) Amounts received from a plan that allows the employee to
set the amount of compensation to be deferred and does not
prescribe retirement age or years of service. These plans include,
but are not limited to, all of the following:
(A) Deferred compensation plans under section 457 of the
internal revenue code.
(B) Distributions from plans under section 401(k) of the
internal revenue code other than plans described in subdivision
(a)(iv).
(C) Distributions from plans under section 403(b) of the
internal revenue code other than plans described in subdivision
(a)(iii).
(ii) Premature distributions paid on separation, withdrawal, or
discontinuance of a plan prior to the earliest date the recipient
could have retired under the provisions of the plan.
(iii) Payments received as an incentive to retire early unless
the distributions are from a pension trust.
(9) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) or (11),
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


in determining taxable income under this section, the following
limitations and restrictions apply:
(a) For a person born before 1946, this subsection provides no
additional restrictions or limitations under subsection (1)(f).
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for a
person born in 1946 through 1952, the sum of the deductions under
subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $20,000.00 for a
single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return. After that person
reaches the age of 67, the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i),
(ii), and (iv) do not apply and that person is eligible for a
deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a
joint return, which deduction is available against all types of
income and is not restricted to income from retirement or pension
benefits. A person who takes the deduction under subsection (1)(e)
is not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $20,000.00 for a
single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return under this
subdivision.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2013 for a person born in 1946
through 1952 and beginning January 1, 2018 for a person born after
1945 who has retired as of January 1, 2013, if that person receives
retirement or pension benefits from employment with a governmental
agency that was not covered by the federal social security act, 42
USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under subsection
(1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $35,000.00 for a single return
and, except as otherwise provided under this subdivision,
$55,000.00 for a joint return. If both spouses filing a joint
return receive retirement or pension benefits from employment with
a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal social
security act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $70,000.00 for a
joint return. After that person reaches the age of 67, the
deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) do not apply and
that person is eligible for a deduction of $35,000.00 for a single
return and $55,000.00 for a joint return, or $70,000.00 for a joint
return if applicable, which deduction is available against all
types of income and is not restricted to income from retirement or
pension benefits. A person who takes the deduction under subsection
(1)(e) is not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $35,000.00
for a single return and $55,000.00 for a joint return, or
$70,000.00 for a joint return if applicable, under this
subdivision.
(d) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c) for a
person who was retired as of January 1, 2013, for a person born
after 1952 who has reached the age of 62 through 66 years of age
and who receives retirement or pension benefits from employment
with a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal
social security act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the
deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to
$15,000.00 for a single return and, except as otherwise provided
under this subdivision, $15,000.00 for a joint return. If both
spouses filing a joint return receive retirement or pension
benefits from employment with a governmental agency that was not
covered by the federal social security act, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm,
the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv)
is limited to $30,000.00 for a joint return.
(e) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c) or (d),
for a person born after 1952, the deduction under subsection
(1)(f)(i), (ii), or (iv) does not apply. When that person reaches the
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


age of 67, that person is eligible for a deduction of $20,000.00
for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return, which
deduction is available against all types of income and is not
restricted to income from retirement or pension benefits. For tax
years that begin before January 1, 2026 and after December 31,
2028, if a person takes the deduction of $20,000.00 for a single
return and $40,000.00 for a joint return, that person shall not
take the deduction under subsection (1)(f)(iii) and shall not take
the personal exemption under subsection (2). For tax years that
begin before January 1, 2026 and after December 31, 2028, that
person may elect not to take the deduction of $20,000.00 for a
single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return and elect to take
the deduction under subsection (1)(f)(iii) and the personal exemption
under subsection (2) if that election would reduce that person's
tax liability. For tax years that begin on and after January 1,
2026 and before January 1, 2029, if a person takes the deduction of
$20,000.00 for a single return or $40,000.00 for a joint return,
that person shall not take the personal exemption under subsection
(2). A person who takes the deduction under subsection (1)(e) is
not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $20,000.00 for a
single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return under this
subdivision.
(f) For a joint return, the limitations and restrictions in
this subsection shall be applied based on the date of birth of the
older spouse filing the joint return. If a deduction under
subsection (1)(f) was claimed on a joint return for a tax year in
which a spouse died and the surviving spouse has not remarried
since the death of that spouse, the surviving spouse is entitled to
claim the deduction under subsection (1)(f) in subsequent tax years
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


subject to the same restrictions and limitations, for a single
return, that would have applied based on the date of birth of the
older of the 2 spouses. For tax years beginning after December 31,
2019, a surviving spouse born after 1945 who has reached the age of
67 and has not remarried since the death of that spouse may elect
to take the deduction that is available against all types of income
subject to the same limitations and restrictions as provided under
this subsection based on the surviving spouse's date of birth
instead of taking the deduction allowed under subsection (1)(f),
for a single return, based on the date of birth of the older
spouse.
(10) In determining taxable income under this section, a
taxpayer may elect to deduct retirement or pension benefits as
provided under subsection (1)(f) with the following limitations and
restrictions or elect to apply the limitations and restrictions in
subsection (9), or subsection (11) if applicable:
(a) For the 2023 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945
and before 1959 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension
benefits not to exceed 25% of the maximum amount of retirement or
pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for
the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's
retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of
that subsection only.
(b) For the 2024 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945
and before 1963 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension
benefits not to exceed 50% of the maximum amount of retirement or
pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for
the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's
retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


that subsection only.
(c) For the 2025 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945
and before 1967 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension
benefits not to exceed 75% of the maximum amount of retirement or
pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for
the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's
retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of
that subsection only.
(d) For the 2026 tax year and each tax year after 2026, a
taxpayer may deduct retirement or pension benefits as provided
under subsection (1)(f), except that the amounts deductible under
subsection (1)(f)(i) and (ii) combined are subject to the same
maximum amounts allowed under subsection (1)(f)(iv) for a single
return and a joint return for that same tax year.
(e) For a joint return, the limitations and restrictions in
this subsection shall be applied based on the date of birth of the
older spouse filing the joint return. If a deduction under
subsection (1)(f) was claimed on a joint return for a tax year in
which a spouse died and the surviving spouse has not remarried
since the death of that spouse, the surviving spouse is entitled to
claim the deduction under subsection (1)(f) in subsequent tax years
subject to the same restrictions and limitations under this
subsection, for a single return, that would have applied based on
the date of birth of the older of the 2 spouses.
(11) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2023, in
determining taxable income under this section, a taxpayer with
retirement or pension benefits received for services as a public
police or fire department employee subject to 1969 PA 312, MCL
423.231 to 423.247, a state police trooper or state police sergeant
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9


subject to 1980 PA 17, MCL 423.271 to 423.287, or a corrections
officer employed by a county sheriff in a county jail, work camp,
or other facility maintained by a county that houses adult
prisoners may elect to deduct retirement or pension benefits as
provided under subsection (1)(f) without any additional limitations
or restrictions or elect to apply the limitations and restrictions
in subsection (9) or (10).
(12) As used in this section:
(a) "Oil and gas" means oil and gas subject to severance tax
under 1929 PA 48, MCL 205.301 to 205.317.
(b) "Senior citizen" means that term as defined in section
514.
(c) "United States Consumer Price Index" means the United
States Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
Final Page
KAS H00242'25 (H-4) u0a7n9